Missouri, session 2026, SB964.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 190.098, RSMo, is repealed and one new
section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 190.098,
to read as follows:
190.098. 1. As used in this section, the term
"community paramedic services" means services that are:
(1) Provided by any entity that:
(a) Employs licensed paramedics who are certified as
community paramedics by the department; and
(b) Has received an endorsement by the department as a
community paramedic service entity;
(2) Provided in a nonemergent setting, independent of
a 911 system or emergency summons;
(3) Consistent with the training and education, as
well as within the scope of skill and practice, of the
personnel and with the supervisory standard approved by the
medical director; and
(4) Reflected and documented in the entity's patient
care plans or protocols approved by the medical director in
accordance with section 190.142.
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 964 2
2. In order for a person to be eligible for
certification by the department as a community paramedic, an
individual shall:
(1) Be currently [certified] licensed as a paramedic;
(2) Successfully complete or have successfully
completed a community paramedic certification program from a
college, university, or educational institution that has
been approved by the department or accredited by a national
accreditation organization approved by the department; and
(3) Complete an application form approved by the
department.
[2.] 3. A community paramedic shall practice in
accordance with protocols and supervisory standards
established by the medical director[. A community paramedic
shall provide services of a health care plan if the plan has
been developed by the patient's physician or by an advanced
practice registered nurse through a collaborative practice
arrangement with a physician or a physician assistant
through a collaborative practice arrangement with a
physician and there is no duplication of services to the
patient from another provider] in collaboration with the
ambulance service administrator. Patient care plans that
are developed by the patient's physician, advanced practice
nurse practitioner, or physician assistant shall be
implemented through a collaboration with the medical
director and agency.
[3.] 4. (1) Any ambulance service [shall enter into a
written contract to provide community paramedic services in
another ambulance service area, as that term is defined in
section 190.100. The contract that is agreed upon may be
for an indefinite period of time, as long as it includes at
least a sixty-day cancellation notice by either ambulance

SB 964 3
service] that seeks to provide community paramedic services
outside of its ambulance service area, as described in
section 190.105 and administered by the department, and in
the service area of another ambulance service that currently
provides community paramedic services shall be required to
have a memorandum of understanding with that ambulance
service regarding the provision of such community paramedic
services. An ambulance service that provides community
paramedic services may provide community paramedic services
without a memorandum of understanding in the ambulance
service area of an ambulance service that is not providing
community paramedic services, but the ambulance service
providing community paramedic services shall provide
notification to the ambulance service with emergency service
responsibilities in the service area of the general
community paramedic activities being performed.
(2) An ambulance service that provides community
paramedic services and that has executed formal contracts or
agreements with health care institutions, hospitals, health
clinics, or insurance companies for the provision of
community paramedic services shall be permitted to honor
those agreements.
(3) For sustained services provided outside the county
of the ambulance services' primary 911 response territory
where another licensed ambulance service also offers
community paramedic services, the community paramedic
program shall coordinate with the local ambulance service.
(4) Any emergency medical response agency seeking to
provide community paramedic services within its designated
response service area may do so if the ground ambulance
service covering the area within which the emergency medical
response agency is located does not provide community

SB 964 4
paramedic services. If such ground ambulance service does
provide community paramedic services, the ground ambulance
service may establish, at its sole discretion, a memorandum
of understanding with the emergency medical response agency
planning to offer community paramedic services in order to
coordinate programs and avoid service duplication. If an
emergency medical response agency is providing community
paramedic services in a service area before the ground
ambulance service in that service area begins offering
community paramedic services, the emergency medical response
agency and the ground ambulance service shall establish a
memorandum of understanding for the coordination of services.
(5) A community paramedic program shall notify the
appropriate local ambulance service when providing services
within the service area of an ambulance service.
(6) The department shall establish regulations for the
purpose of recognizing community paramedic service entities
that have met the standards necessary to provide community
paramedic services, including physician medical oversight,
100 training, patient record keeping, formal relationships with
101 primary care services where necessary, and quality
102 improvement policies. The department shall issue an
103 endorsement to any community paramedic service entity that
104 meets such standards that allow the entity to provide
105 community paramedic services for a period of five years.
106 [4.] 5. A community paramedic is subject to the
107 provisions of sections 190.001 to 190.245 and rules
108 promulgated under sections 190.001 to 190.245.
109 [5.] 6. No person shall hold himself or herself out as
110 a community paramedic or provide the services of a community
111 paramedic unless such person is certified by the department.

SB 964 5
112 [6.] 7. The medical director shall approve the
113 implementation of the community paramedic program.
114 [7.] 8. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is
115 defined in section 536.010, that is created under the
116 authority delegated in this section shall become effective
117 only if it complies with and is subject to all of the
118 provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section
119 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and
120 if any of the powers vested with the general assembly
121 pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective
122 date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently
123 held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking
124 authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28,
125 2013, shall be invalid and void.
✓